California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
This chapter does not apply to a poultry plant where poultry is slaughtered, dressed, and sold upon the premises where it was produced for purposes other than resale, if the entire poultry meat output of the producer is so sold.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Licenses [24741. - 24752.]

24741.

A person shall not operate a poultry plant unless he has obtained a license pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

24742.

Each person shall, before operating a poultry plant, file an application with the director for a license to operate the poultry plant. The application shall be in such form as the director may prescribe.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

24743.

The application for a license shall be accompanied by the license application fee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

24744.

(a) Subject to Section 24745.5, the application fee for a new, previously unlicensed poultry plant is five hundred dollars ($500) for a license for one year for each poultry plant that the applicant desires to operate.

(b) The fee for a license application submitted upon change of ownership of an existing, previously licensed poultry plant shall be based on the number of poultry slaughtered by the poultry plant during the preceding October through September time period, as described in subdivision (b) of Section 24745.

(c) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed, unless a later enacted statute, that is enacted before January 1,
 2027, deletes or extends that date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 392, Sec. 5.   (SB 815)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

24745.

(a) Application for renewal of a license accompanied by a renewal fee shall be made on or before its expiration.

(b) Subject to Section 24745.5, the annual license renewal fee for a poultry plant is:

(1) Five hundred dollars ($500) if the plant slaughtered 10,000 or fewer poultry during the preceding October through September time period.

(2) Seven hundred fifty dollars ($750) if the plant slaughtered between 10,000 and 100,000 poultry during the preceding October through September time period.

(3) One thousand two hundred dollars ($1,200) if the plant slaughtered over
 100,000 poultry during the preceding October through September time period.

(c) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed, unless a later enacted statute, that is enacted before January 1, 2027, deletes or extends that date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 392, Sec. 6.   (SB 815)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

24745.5.

If a licensee has two or more licenses in effect at the same meat processing establishment, custom livestock slaughterhouse, place of business, or poultry plant, pursuant to Section 19010, 19011, 19240, 19260, 19280, or 24741, the license fee that is the highest amount shall be paid in full and each additional license fee shall be in an amount that is 50 percent of the fee that would otherwise be applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 134, Sec. 9.   (AB 107)   Effective July 26, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

24746.

Each license shall expire on the last day of the calendar year for which it is issued. The fee shall not be prorated.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 133, Sec. 36.   (AB 120)   Effective July 26, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

24747.

Each person that holds a license for a poultry plant shall file an application for the renewal of the license on or before the date of the expiration of the license.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

24748.

Applicants for renewal who have not paid the renewal fee by the expiration date of the license shall be assessed a penalty of 10 percent of the unpaid balance. Failure to pay the renewal fee plus the penalty within 90 days of expiration shall cause a revocation of a license.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 133, Sec. 38.   (AB 120)   Effective July 26, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

24749.

Plans and specifications for any intended construction or major reconstruction of a poultry plant shall be submitted to the director. The director shall approve or disapprove the plans and specifications within 30 days.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

24750.

The director may, after hearing, refuse to issue a license or renew a license and may revoke or suspend any license for any violation of, or failure to comply with, any provision of this chapter or any regulation which is adopted pursuant to it, or for any violation of, or failure to comply with, Section 25091.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

24751.

Any proceedings pursuant to Section 24750 shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500), Part 1, Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The director shall have all the powers which are granted in that chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

24752.

(a) All fees, charges, and collections collected pursuant to Sections 24744, 24745, and 24748 shall be deposited in the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund.

(b) All fees, charges, and collections collected pursuant to Sections 24744, 24745, and 24748 shall be used for the enforcement of this division and shall be for a specific benefit or privilege conferred directly to the payer and such benefit or privilege shall not be provided to those not charged.

(c) Fees shall not exceed the reasonable costs associated with issuing a license or permit, performing investigations, inspections, and audits, enforcing provisions pursuant to the
 license or permit, and administrative enforcement and adjudication thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 133, Sec. 39.   (AB 120)   Effective July 26, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Sanitation [24771. - 24772.]

24771.

A person shall not do any of the following:

(a) Operate a poultry plant which is not sanitary.

(b) Operate a poultry plant in a manner or under conditions which are not sanitary.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

24772.

After each day’s operation, a poultry plant and its outer premises shall be promptly cleaned in the manner which is prescribed by the regulations.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Marks and Labels [24801. - 24802.]

24801.

This article does not apply to New York dressed fowl until November 1, 1967.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

24802.

Poultry meat shall not be packed, repacked, cut up, recut, or sold unless each container or each carcass is marked in the manner which is required by this chapter and the regulations which are adopted pursuant to it.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Violations [24831. - 24831.]

24831.

It is unlawful for any person to do any of the following:

(a) Violate any provision of this chapter or any regulation which is adopted pursuant to it.

(b) Operate a poultry plant without a license.

(c) Mislabel poultry meat.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Poultry Meat Inspection for Wholesomeness [24951. - 25151.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [24951. - 24963.]

24951.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

24952.

“Fowl” includes chickens, turkeys, ducks, geese, and other domesticated birds.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

24953.

“Growing poultry” means feeding and caring for poultry.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

24954.

“Marked” means plainly, legibly, and conspicuously labeled, tagged, stenciled, or branded pursuant to this chapter and any regulations which are adopted pursuant to it.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

24955.

“Mislabel” means the placing, or presence of any false, deceptive, or misleading mark, tag, brand, design, inscription, statement, billing, invoice, placard, sign, or other descriptive designation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

24956.

“New York dressed fowl” means fowl from which the feathers have been removed and the blood drawn and which is offered for sale as a whole fowl with the head, feet, and entrails intact.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

24957.

“Poultry” means domesticated fowl or domesticated rabbit which is intended for use for human food.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

24958.

“Poultry meat” means the carcass of poultry or any part of such carcass.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

24959.

“Poultry meat inspector” means a person who after examination and demonstration has been issued a license by the director to inspect poultry meat for wholesomeness.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

24960.

“Poultry plant” means any of the following:

(a) Any place where poultry is slaughtered, dressed, or drawn.

(b) Any place, except a retail store or eating place, where poultry meat or poultry meat food products are cooked, cured, smoked, cut up, recut, packed, or repacked, or otherwise prepared for human food.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

24961.

“Producer” means a person that is engaged in the business of growing any poultry, which is marketed as poultry meat, for a period of three weeks or more for the purpose of increasing the size and weight of such poultry.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

24962.

“Regulations” means regulations which are adopted by the director to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

24963.

“Wholesome” means that the poultry or poultry meat is free from all of the following:

(a) Physical evidence of any disease which is injurious to human health.

(b) Diseases or conditions which have rendered or would render the poultry meat unsuited for human food.

(c) Serious destruction of the flesh by disease or injury.

(d) Contamination by any substance which is injurious to human health.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. General Provisions [24991. - 24997.]

24991.

The director shall adopt regulations for carrying out this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

24992.

The regulations may include standards for poultry meat food products. The standards shall conform, so far as possible, to the standards which are adopted by the United States Department of Agriculture that pertain to the preparation and processing of poultry meat food products and the poultry meat which is used in such products.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

24993.

The director shall furnish to each person that holds a license which is issued pursuant to this chapter, or that makes an application for a license, a copy of the regulations.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

24994.

The director may bring an action to enjoin the violation or threatened violation of any provision of this chapter or the regulations which are adopted pursuant to it in the superior court in and for the county in which the violation occurred or is about to occur.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

24995.

Any proceeding pursuant to Section 24994 shall conform to the requirements of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525), Title 7, Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure. The director shall not, however, be required to allege facts necessary to show or tending to show lack of adequate remedy at law or to show or tending to show irreparable damage or loss.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

24996.

The director may inspect, reinspect, or order the reinspection of any poultry meat or poultry meat food product which is being processed or stored in a plant that is licensed under this part. He shall condemn or order the condemnation of any such poultry meat or poultry meat product and poultry meat food product which is found to be unwholesome.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

24997.

If an action of an inspector in condemning any poultry meat or poultry meat product is questioned, appeal by the licensed plant operator may be made to the immediate supervisor of the inspector, and from his or her decision appeal may be made to the Chief of the Bureau of Meat and Poultry Inspection whose decision is final.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 699, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Exemptions [25021. - 25024.]

25021.

This chapter, except Section 25128, does not apply to poultry meat which has been inspected and passed for wholesomeness by the United States Department of Agriculture if the immediate container or carcass of the poultry meat bears the official wholesomeness inspection mark of such department at the time of sale. If, however, any cooking, curing, smoking, packing, repacking, cutting up or recutting is done in this state, except in a retail store or public eating house, it shall be done in a poultry plant under federal or state inspection.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

25022.

This chapter, except Section 25128, does not apply to poultry meat which bears the official mark of a city, county, or state poultry meat inspection service for wholesomeness in another state which has requirements equal to those provided for in this chapter, if such out-of-state requirements have been approved by the director.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

25023.

(a) This chapter does not apply to poultry meat which is derived from poultry which is produced upon the premises where it is slaughtered if the poultry meat is sold by the producer in any of the following ways:

(1) At retail on the premises.

(2) At retail by the producer of the poultry meat off of the premises, either direct to consumers at their homes or at a retail stand which is operated by the producer in a farmers’ market.

(b) As used in this section, “producer” includes only an individual producer who does not employ, except in unforeseeable exigencies, any person except members of his or her immediate family.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 535, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

25024.

This chapter does not apply to poultry meat which is derived from poultry which is slaughtered, dressed, and sold on the premises where it is produced for purposes other than resale, if the entire poultry meat output of the producer of such poultry is so sold.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Meat Inspector Licenses [25051. - 25063.]

25051.

A person shall not act as a poultry meat inspector unless he has a license which is issued pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

25052.

Each person before acting as a poultry meat inspector shall apply to and receive from the director a license to inspect poultry meat.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

25053.

(a) The application fee for a license is one hundred dollars ($100).

(b) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed, unless a later enacted statute, that is enacted before January 1, 2027, deletes or extends that date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 392, Sec. 7.   (SB 815)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

25054.

Every license shall expire on the last day of the calendar year for which it is issued.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

25055.

(a) Application for renewal of a license accompanied by a fee of one hundred dollars ($100) shall be made on or before the last day of the calendar year for which the license was issued.

(b) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed, unless a later enacted statute, that is enacted before January 1, 2027, deletes or extends that date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 392, Sec. 8.   (SB 815)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

25056.

(a) Applicants for renewal who have not paid the renewal fee by the expiration date of the license shall be assessed a twenty-five dollar ($25) penalty. Failure to pay the renewal fee plus the penalty within 90 days of expiration shall cause a revocation of a license.

(b) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed, unless a later enacted statute, that is enacted before January 1, 2027, deletes or extends that date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 392, Sec. 9.   (SB 815)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

25057.

If a license lapses for two calendar years, it is not subject to renewal. Any application for the renewal of such license shall be considered a new application.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

25058.

The director shall, after the written and oral examination and demonstration which are prescribed by Section 25059, issue to any person who passes the examination and is otherwise qualified a license to inspect poultry meat for wholesomeness. If an applicant for a license to inspect poultry meat does not take such examination within one year after the date of the receipt of his application by the director, his application expires.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

25059.

The written and oral examination and demonstration which are required by Section 25058 shall show the applicant’s ability to understand laws and regulations which pertain to poultry meat inspection and his knowledge of all of the following:

(a) Conditions which affect wholesomeness in poultry meat and poultry meat products.

(b) The anatomy of poultry.

(c) Routine processing techniques and equipment which are used in poultry processing plants, and poultry plant sanitation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

25060.

The director shall, from time to time, arrange for the conducting of schools of instruction for poultry meat inspectors.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

25061.

The director may, after hearing, refuse to issue a license or renew a license and he may suspend or revoke any license for any violation of, or failure to comply with, any provision of this chapter or the regulations which are adopted pursuant to it. The director may suspend temporarily, pending hearing, any license for any willful or deliberate violation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

25062.

Any proceedings under Section 25061 shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500), Part 1, Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The director shall have all the powers which are granted in that chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

25063.

(a) All fees, charges, and collections collected pursuant to Sections 25053, 25055, and 25056 shall be deposited in the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund.

(b) All fees, charges, and collections collected pursuant to Sections 25053, 25055, and 25056 shall be used for the enforcement of this division and shall be for a specific benefit or privilege conferred directly to the payer and such benefit or privilege shall not be provided to those not charged.

(c) Fees shall not exceed the reasonable costs associated with issuing a license or permit, performing investigations, inspections, and audits, enforcing provisions pursuant to the
 license or permit, and administrative enforcement and adjudication thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 133, Sec. 44.   (AB 120)   Effective July 26, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Requirements for Inspection [25091. - 25095.]

25091.

A person shall not operate a poultry plant unless all the poultry meat in the poultry plant is inspected by a poultry meat inspector pursuant to the regulations.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

25092.

The poultry meat inspector shall inspect, pursuant to the regulations, and classify any poultry meat, poultry meat product, or poultry meat food product which is presented for inspection into one of the following classes:

(a) Wholesome.

(b) Retained for further inspection.

(c) Condemned for human food.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

25093.

The poultry meat inspector shall apply or direct the application of the proper marks, as determined by regulation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

25094.

All poultry meat which is condemned for human food shall be disposed of pursuant to the regulations.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

25095.

Poultry meat may be passed for further processing in a plant which is licensed pursuant to this part.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Marks and Labels [25122. - 25128.]

25122.

Poultry meat shall not be packed, repacked, cut up, recut, or sold unless each container or each carcass is marked in the manner which is required by this chapter and the regulations which are adopted pursuant to it.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

25123.

A poultry meat inspector shall place or cause to be placed a mark on each carcass or container of poultry meat before the poultry meat is removed from a poultry plant.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

25124.

The marks which are required by this article are in addition to those required by Section 24802 but may be in combination with such marks.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

25125.

The director shall determine by regulation the official design of the marks which are required by this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

25126.

Each poultry plant shall submit samples of the proposed method of use of the design of a mark to the director. The method shall be approved by the director before it is used.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

25127.

It is unlawful for any person to sell or mark as inspected for wholesomeness any poultry meat that has not been inspected and passed for wholesomeness pursuant to this chapter and regulations which are adopted pursuant to it.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

25128.

It is unlawful for any person, other than the consumer of poultry meat, to remove from any whole carcass of poultry meat, or from any part of a dismembered carcass of poultry meat, any official wholesomeness inspection mark of the United States Department of Agriculture, or of any city, county, or state poultry meat inspection service. As used in this section, “consumer” includes a restaurant or other place where such poultry meat is cooked and sold for consumption on or off the premises.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Violations [25151. - 25151.]

25151.

It is unlawful for any person to violate any provision of this chapter, or any regulations which are adopted by the director pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2. CLASSIFICATION OF POULTRY AND RABBIT MEAT [25401. - 26151.]



  CHAPTER 1. Definitions [25401. - 25412.]

25401.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this chapter govern the construction of this part.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

25402.

“Class” means a division of poultry meat which is based on essential physical characteristics which with the weights differentiate between uses of the meat.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

25403.

“Fowl” includes chickens, turkeys, ducks, geese, and other domesticated birds.

(History: Enacted by stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

25404.

“Growing poultry” means feeding and caring for poultry.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

25405.

“Marked” means plainly, legibly, and conspicuously labeled, stamped, tagged, stenciled, or branded, in the manner which is prescribed by regulations of the director, to show the class of poultry meat.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

25406.

“Mislabel” means the placing, or presence of any false, deceptive, or misleading mark, tag, brand, design, inscription, statement, billing, invoice, placard, sign or other descriptive designation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

25407.

“New York dressed fowl” means fowl from which the feathers have been removed and the blood drawn and which is offered for sale as a whole fowl with the head, feet, and entrails intact.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

25408.

“Poultry” means domesticated fowl and domesticated rabbit which is intended for use for human food.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

25409.

“Poultry meat” means the carcass of poultry or any part of the carcass, except the giblets. It does not include live poultry or processed poultry meat.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

25410.

“Poultry plant” means any of the following:

(a) Any place where poultry is slaughtered, dressed, or drawn.

(b) Any place where poultry meat is cut up, recut, packed or repacked, or otherwise prepared for human food.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

25411.

“Processing” means the commercial manufacturing of products of poultry meat by any method of cooking. It also includes all of the following:

(a) Cutting up into pieces smaller than the customary parts such as, in the case of poultry, necks, breasts, wings, backs, legs, thighs, or similar and identifiable portions of the carcass.

(b) Complete deboning of poultry meat.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

25412.

“Producer” means any person that is engaged in the business of growing any poultry, which is marketed as poultry meat, for a period of three weeks or more for the purpose of increasing the size and weight of such poultry.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. General Provisions [25551. - 25566.]

25551.

The director shall adopt regulations for carrying out this part.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

25552.

The director shall enforce this part where any poultry meat is packed, repacked, cut up, or recut.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

25553.

The director and the commissioners of each county, under the supervision of the director, shall enforce this part where any poultry meat is offered for sale or sold.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

25554.

An enforcing officer may do all of the following:

(a) Enter and inspect any place or conveyance where any poultry or poultry meat is produced, prepared, packed, repacked, cut up, recut, stored, delivered for shipment, loaded, shipped, transported, or sold.

(b) Inspect all poultry and poultry meat and any container of poultry or poultry meat which is found at the place or conveyance which is entered and inspected.

(c) Take for inspection such representative samples of the poultry, poultry meat, or containers as may be necessary to determine whether or not this part has been violated.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

25555.

Any enforcing officer may, while enforcing this part, seize or hold as evidence all or any part of any lot of poultry meat which is found to be in violation of this part as may in his judgment be necessary to obtain the conviction of the party he knows or believes has violated or is violating any provision of this part.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

25556.

Any lot of poultry meat which does not comply in all respects with the provisions of this part and the regulations which are adopted pursuant to it is a public nuisance.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

25557.

Any enforcing officer who has reason to believe that any lot of poultry meat does not comply in all respects with this part, may hold the lot pending proceedings to condemn and abate it as a public nuisance pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

25558.

The officer may affix to any lot which is held pursuant to Section 25557 a tag or notice which warns that the lot is held and states the reasons for which it is held. It is unlawful for any person, except an authorized enforcing officer, to detach, alter, deface, or destroy any such tag or notice which is affixed to any such lot, or remove or dispose of such lot in any manner or under conditions other than as prescribed by such tag or notice, except upon written permission of an authorized enforcing officer or by the order of a court.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

25559.

The officer by whom any lot of poultry meat is held shall cause a notice of noncompliance to be served upon the person in possession of the lot. The notice of noncompliance shall include a description of the lot, the place where and the reasons for which it is held, and shall give notice that the lot is a public nuisance and subject to disposal pursuant to this chapter, unless within a specified time the lot is reconditioned or the deficiency otherwise corrected so as to bring it into compliance.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

25560.

If the person served is not the sole owner of the lot of poultry meat, or does not have authority as agent for the owner to bring the lot into compliance, such person shall notify the officer by whom such lot is held, in writing, of the names and addresses of the owner and every other person that is known to him to claim an interest in the lot. Any person served is liable for any loss sustained by such owner or other person whose name and address he has knowingly concealed from such officer.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

25561.

If the lot of poultry meat is not reconditioned or the deficiency otherwise corrected so as to bring it into compliance within the time which is specified in the notice, the enforcing officer shall cause a copy of the notice of noncompliance to be served upon every person that is designated in writing by the person in possession of the lot to be the owner or to claim an interest in it.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

25562.

Any notice which is required by this chapter may be served personally or by mail addressed to the person to be served at his last known address.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

25563.

The enforcing officer, with the written consent of every person that is served, may destroy the lot of poultry meat or otherwise abate the nuisance. If any such person fails or refuses to give such consent, the enforcing officer shall proceed as provided in Sections 25564 and 25565.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

25564.

If the lot of poultry meat that is held is perishable or subject to rapid deterioration, the enforcing officer may file a verified petition in superior court to destroy the lot or otherwise abate the nuisance. The petition shall show the condition of the lot, that the lot is situated within the county, that the lot is held, and that notice of noncompliance has been served pursuant to this chapter. The court may thereupon order that the lot be forthwith destroyed or the nuisance otherwise abated as set forth in the order. A proceeding under this section is a limited civil case if the value of the property in controversy is less than or equal to the maximum amount in controversy for a limited civil case under Section 85 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 43, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

25565.

If the lot of poultry meat which is held is not perishable or subject to rapid deterioration, the enforcing officer shall immediately report the condition of the lot to the director. Within five days from the receipt of such report, the director may file a petition in the superior court in the county where the lot is situated for an order to show cause, returnable in five days, why the lot should not be abated.

The owner or person in possession of the lot of poultry meat, on his own motion within five days from the expiration of the time specified in the notice of noncompliance may file a petition in such court for an order to show cause, returnable in five days, why the lot should not be released to petitioner and any warning tags previously affixed removed from it.

Final determination by court in either case shall be within a period of not to exceed 20 days from the date the petition is filed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

25566.

The court may enter judgment ordering that the lot of poultry meat be condemned and destroyed in the manner directed by the court or relabeled, denatured, or otherwise processed, or sold or released upon such conditions as the court in its discretion may impose to insure that the nuisance will be abated. If the poultry meat is sold by order of court, the costs of storage, handling, and reconditioning or disposal shall be deducted from the proceeds of sale and the balance, if any, paid into court for the owner.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Exemptions [25701. - 25704.]

25701.

This part, except Section 26008, does not apply to poultry meat or a container of poultry meat which is marked with the official class as prescribed by the Consumer and Marketing Service of the United States Department of Agriculture; if such official class marking meets the requirements of this part.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

25702.

This part, except Section 26008, does not apply to poultry meat which is marked as to a class that is officially approved by another inspection service whose requirements for class markings meet the requirements of this part.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

25703.

(a) This part does not apply to poultry meat which is derived from poultry which is produced upon the premises where it is slaughtered if the poultry meat is sold by the producer in any of the following ways:

(1) At retail upon the premises.

(2) At retail off of the premises, either direct to consumers at their homes or at a retail stand which is operated by the producer in a farmers’ market.

(b) As used in this section, “producer” includes only an individual producer who does not employ, except in unforeseeable exigencies, any person except members of his or her immediate family.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 535, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

25704.

This part does not apply to poultry meat which is derived from poultry which is slaughtered, dressed, and sold on the premises where it is produced for purposes other than resale, if the entire poultry meat output of the producer of such poultry is so sold.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Poultry and Rabbit Meat Classes [25851. - 25857.]

25851.

The classes of the kinds of poultry meat are as established in this chapter and any regulations which are adopted by the director pursuant to Section 25857.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

25852.

The classes of chicken meat, as determined by inspection of appearance and other physical characteristics, are as follows:

(a) “Rock Cornish game hen” or “Cornish game hen” means a young immature chicken of either sex (usually five to six weeks of age) which weighs not more than two pounds ready-to-cook weight that was prepared from a Cornish chicken of the progeny of a Cornish chicken crossed with another breed of chicken.

(b) “Broiler” or “fryer” means a young chicken (usually under 16 weeks of age) of either sex, that is tender-meated, with soft, pliable, smooth-textured skin, and flexible breastbone cartilage.
